Connecticut, session 2026, HB05311.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 53a-40e of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) If any person is convicted of, or found not guilty by reason of
mental disease or defect of, (1) a violation of section 53a-70b of the
general statutes, revision of 1958, revised to January 1, 2019, or
subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection (a) of section 53-21, section 53a-59,
53a-59a, 53a-60, 53a-60a, 53a-60b, 53a-60c, 53a-70, 53a-70a, 53a-70c, 53a-
71, 53a-72a, 53a-72b, 53a-73a, 53a-181c, 53a-181d, 53a-181e, 53a-182b or
53a-183, subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of section 53a-192a, section 53a-
223, 53a-223a or 53a-223b or attempt or conspiracy to violate any of said
sections or section 53a-54a, or (2) any crime that the court determines
constitutes a family violence crime, as defined in section 46b-38a, or
attempt or conspiracy to commit any such crime, the court may, in
addition to imposing the sentence authorized for the crime under
section 53a-35a or 53a-36, if the court is of the opinion that the history
and character and the nature and circumstances of the criminal conduct

House Bill No. 5311
of such offender indicate that a standing criminal protective order will
best serve the interest of the victim and the public, issue a standing
criminal protective order which shall remain in effect for a duration
specified by the court until modified or revoked by the court for good
cause shown. If any person is convicted of, or found not guilty by reason
of mental disease or defect of, any crime not specified in subdivision (1)
or (2) of this subsection, the court may, for good cause shown, issue a
standing criminal protective order pursuant to this subsection. In any
case that the court does not issue a standing criminal protective order
against a person convicted of, or found not guilty by reason of mental
disease or defect of a crime specified in subdivision (2) of this
subsection, the court shall state on the record its reasons for not issuing
such order.
Governor's Action:
Approved May 26, 2026
Public Act No. 26-32 2 of 2